Utah statutes.
59-10-1311.   Election Campaign Fund contribution -- Transfer from General
Fund -- Form and procedure.
(1) (a)  A resident or nonresident individual, other than a nonresident alien,
may designate on the resident or nonresident individual's individual income
tax return a contribution of $2 to the Election Campaign Fund created by
Section 59-10-1312, if the resident or nonresident individual:
(i)  has a liability under this chapter for a taxable year of $2 or more; and
(ii)  files a return under this chapter.
(b)  The commission shall transfer $2 from the General Fund to the Election
Campaign Fund for each contribution made on an individual income tax return
under this Subsection (1).
(c)  The transfer described in Subsection (1)(b) shall be made from revenue
generated from state sales and use tax revenues collected in accordance with
Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax Act.
(2) (a)  A contribution under Subsection (1) may be made with respect to any
taxable year at the time a resident or nonresident individual files a return
for that taxable year.
(b)  The commission shall include the contribution allowed by this section:
(i)  on a return under this chapter; and
(ii)  for any political party as defined by Section 20A-1-102 that has
qualified as a political party in the first six months of the calendar year
for which the return is prepared.
(c)  The commission shall place a political party described in Subsection
(2)(b) on a return described in Subsection (2)(b) in alphabetical order.
(d)  The commission shall include on a return described in Subsection (2)(b):
(i)  the option for a resident or nonresident individual to indicate that no
contribution is to be made to any political party; and
(ii)  a statement that a contribution a resident or nonresident individual,
other than a nonresident alien, makes under this section may not:
(A)  increase the resident or nonresident individual's tax liability under
this chapter; or
(B)  reduce the resident or nonresident individual's refund under this
chapter.
